Utah statutes.
9-4-904.5.   Corporation as continuation of agency.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 2001, the Utah Housing Finance Agency shall become known as the Utah Housing Corporation.

(2)  The corporation is a continuation of the Utah Housing Finance Agency and shall:

(a)  possess all rights, title, privileges, powers, immunities, property, and claims of the agency; and

(b)  fulfill and perform all obligations of the agency, including all agency obligations relating to outstanding bonds and notes.

